Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2005
Sections; how construed.

Sections 8-2001 to 8-2004 are not to be construed to limit the discovery or admissibility in any civil action of any documents that are not compliance review documents and shall not preclude a depository institution's primary state or federal regulator from obtaining compliance review documents.

Laws 1995, LB 626, § 5.